Utah statutes.
36-12-19.   Investigatory powers of the Legislature.
In the discharge of its legislative investigatory powers, the Legislature, or
either house or any committee thereof,  may:
(1)  administer oaths; and
(2)  issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
any papers, books, accounts, documents, other tangible things, and testimony,
by following the procedures contained in Title 36, Chapter 14.
